Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 2. Property Destruction and Defacement

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-201.
Property destruction and defacement; grading; penalties; aggregated costs or values.

A person is guilty of property destruction and defacement if he knowingly defaces, injures or destroys property of another without the owner’s consent.

Property destruction and defacement is:

A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if the cost of restoring injured property or the value of the property if destroyed is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00);

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 44, § 2.

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if the cost of restoring injured property or the value of the property if destroyed is one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or more.

If a series of injuries results from a single continuing course of conduct, a single violation of this section may be charged and penalties imposed based upon the aggregate cost or value of the property injured or destroyed.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1985, ch. 44, §§ 1, 2; 2004, ch. 126, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (b)(i) and (iii), substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)” for “five hundred dollars ($500.00).”

Constitutionality. —

The word “willfully” as used in former statute was not vague or ambiguous and did include and comprehend an unlawful and evil intent. It therefore was not violative of the due process standard of art. 1, § 6, Wyo. Const., as being vague or overbroad. Todd v. State, 566 P.2d 597,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1977).

Burglary and property destruction separate offenses. —

Burglary requires unauthorized entry of a building or vehicle; property destruction does not. Property destruction requires unauthorized destruction or injury to property; burglary does not. Even though both violations can arise from the same incident, each has an element not found in the other; burglary and property destruction are defined by different statutes with different elements and provide separate penalties and, therefore, constitute two separate offenses. Longstreth v. State, 890 P.2d 551,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1995).

Injury to property. —

Jury instruction did not impermissibly permit a conviction when property was injured, not destroyed, where the statutory language is disjunctive, permitting a conviction for defacing, injuring, or destroying property. Christian v. State, 883 P.2d 376,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1994).

Broad measure of damages. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-3-201(a) unambiguously provides the broad measure of damages, which was here the cost of restoring the victim's truck, and that it was up to the jury to decide the reasonable cost of restoring the truck, and as part of that decision to determine whether to use the cost of used glass or new for the truck windows, and whether the camper shell was part of the truck or a separate item.
Roden v. State, 2007 WY 200, 173 P.3d 369,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 2007).

Evidence sufficient for conviction. —

In a trial for injuring or destroying property of another, the only element of the crime in issue was the identity of defendant, and the circumstantial evidence from which identity could be inferred consisted of defendant's prior statement that he was considering slashing the victim's tires and no one would be able to prove it, his continuing attitude of hostility directed toward interfering with adoption proceedings evidencing motive, his phone call that he was going to come and pick up the child on the night in which the damage occurred, testimony that he was in the area on that night until 1:30 in the morning which rebutted a hearsay alibi, the fact that no one else in the vicinity suffered damage at that time, and the failure to deny the conduct when victim asked him about it. When this evidence is examined in the light most favorable to the state, it justifies the inference of identity and the conclusion that the jury properly found defendant guilty beyond a reasonable doubt. Coleman v. State, 741 P.2d 99,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 489

(Wyo. 1987).

State presented sufficient evidence to prove that the damages amounted to $1,000 or more because the victim and a manager from an automobile glass company testified that he paid $1,715 to fix the windows on the truck and the camper shell; defendant was allowed to present evidence suggesting that figure was too high and it was reasonable for the jury to determine that it was impractical, impossible, or unreasonable to replace the broken truck windows with used glass.
Roden v. State, 2007 WY 200, 173 P.3d 369,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 2007).

Where defendant and his wife rented a home and garage, where defendant after arguing with his wife drove his pickup truck through the closed garage door and struck his wife's car, which was parked inside the garage, and where defendant did so a second time, this time driving his wife's car through the garage's rear wall, the trial court did not err in denying defendant's motion for a judgment of acquittal, and the evidence was sufficient to support defendant's conviction of felony property destruction under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-3-201(a) because a person was guilty of property destruction if he knowingly defaced, injured, or destroyed another's property without the owner's consent. That defendant held a possessory interest in the property did not vest with him consent to destroy it; thus, defendant could be found guilty because he knowingly damaged or destroyed rented or leased property without the landlord's consent.
Fuller v. State, 2010 WY 55, 230 P.3d 309,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2010).

Defendant was not entitled to a judgment of acquittal under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-3-201

(2017) because he only disassembled a motorcycle where it was intact when the victims left it, but was disassembled, lacking essential parts, and not functioning when it was located. Kuebel v. State, 2019 WY 75, 446 P.3d 179,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2019).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of property destruction as his voluntary and intentional conduct of eluding police in a high-speed chase and driving while under the influence of methamphetamine was the conduct that caused damage to a victim’s vehicle and the planter and tree owned by a city. Childers v. State, 2021 WY 93, 493 P.3d 168,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2021).

Jury instructions. —

Even though it might have been appropriate for the trial court to insert the word “reasonable” in the jury instructions concerning the value of the victim's injured truck, given the court's conclusion that the jury could consider the reasonable cost of repair or restoration, it was not reversible error for the trial court to adhere to the language of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-3-201(a) and the pattern jury instructions and to refuse the last-minute request to change the jury instructions.
Roden v. State, 2007 WY 200, 173 P.3d 369,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 2007).

Prosecutorial misconduct. —

Defendant's conviction for felony property destruction was inappropriate because the prosecutor misstated the law during closing argument when she told the jury that all the State had to show was that defendant jumped on the car, and that it did not have to show that he intended to damage it; Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-3-201

required proof that defendant deliberately damaged the vehicle or intended that result. Considering the evidence that defendant was goofing around was running from a girl before sliding across the roof of the victim's car in the process, there was a reasonable probability that the verdict would have been more favorable to defendant but for the prosecutor's misstatement to the jury.
Morris v. State, 2009 WY 88, 210 P.3d 1101,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2009).

Probation Revocation. —

Upon defendant's plea of no contest to one count of property destruction, the district court sentenced defendant to a suspended term of imprisonment of four to seven years, placed him on four years of supervised probation under specified terms and conditions, and ordered him to pay restitution in the amount of $ 8,570.47. When defendant violated the terms of his probation by failing to pay restitution, the district court did not abuse its discretion by revoking his probation and reinstating his original prison sentence; the existence of other alleged violations did not taint the district court's decision.
Foster v. State, 2010 WY 135, 240 P.3d 200,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 2010).

Quoted

in

Bradley v. State, 635 P.2d 1161,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 391

(Wyo. 1981).

Stated

in

WJH v. State, 2001 WY 54, 24 P.3d 1147,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

Smith v. State, 598 P.2d 1389,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 449

(Wyo. 1979);
Keller v. State, 723 P.2d 1244,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 604

(Wyo. 1986);
Young v. State, 904 P.2d 359,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1995);
Grainey v. State, 997 P.2d 1035,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2000);
Wheaton v. State, 2003 WY 56, 68 P.3d 1167,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2003);
Mascarenas v. State, 2003 WY 124, 76 P.3d 1258,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2003);
Gibbs v. State, 2008 WY 79, 187 P.3d 862,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(July 14, 2008);
Landeroz v. State, 2011 WY 168, 267 P.3d 1075,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Dec. 28, 2011); Grimes v. State, 2013 WY 84, 304 P.3d 972,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Jul 11, 2013).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-202.
Altering landmarks; penalties.

A person is guilty of altering landmarks if, with intent to destroy or deface the mark on a monument, landmark or bearing-tree designating the corner or boundary of a tract of land, he knowingly:

Displaces the monument or landmark;

Defaces or alters the mark; or

Breaks, cuts down or removes the monument, landmark or bearing-tree.

Altering landmarks is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-203.
Cruelty to animals; penalties; limitation on manner of destruction. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1985, ch. 174, § 1; 1987, ch. 91, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 23, § 1; 2000, ch. 86, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 165, § 1; 2008, ch. 19, § 1; 2011, ch. 177, § 1; 2017 ch. 141, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 181, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; repealed by 2021 ch. 30, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 6-3-204.
Littering; penalties.

A person is guilty of littering if he places, throws, scatters or deposits garbage, debris, refuse or waste material, objects or substances, including abandoned or junked vehicles, upon the property of another. Operators of motor vehicles are responsible under this section for the disposition or ejection of garbage, debris or other material from the vehicle while the vehicle is being operated on the roads or highways of this state.

This section does not apply to discharges which are regulated, controlled or limited by air, land or water quality laws or regulations.

Littering is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both. Littering, involving the disposal of a container with body fluids along a highway right of way, is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than nine (9) months, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both. The court may suspend all or a part of a sentence imposed under this section and require the person convicted of littering to perform up to forty (40) hours of labor in the form of cleaning litter debris from public roads, parks or other public areas or facilities.

In addition to any other peace officer, game and fish law enforcement personnel qualified pursuant to W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-707

are authorized to enforce the provisions of this section.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1985, ch. 44, § 1; 2004, ch. 70, § 1; 2008, ch. 35, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, inserted the second sentence in (c).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added (d).

Actions by federal agents. —

Court of appeals affirmed the district court's judgment removing a criminal case the State of Wyoming filed in state court against a federal agent and a contractor who was working for the U.S. Government, which charged them with violating Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-3-303(a) and 6-3-204(a), and dismissing the charges, because activities the agent and contractor were conducting to locate gray wolves and place radio collars on them were authorized by federal regulations, and their conduct was objectively reasonable at the time they trespassed on private land. Wyoming v. Livingston, 443 F.3d 1211,

2006 U.S. App. LEXIS 8502

(10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 549 U.S. 1019, 127 S. Ct. 553, 166 L. Ed. 2d 409, 2006 U.S. LEXIS 8388 (U.S. 2006).

Publisher's free speech rights outweigh litter prohibition.—

Publisher of a free weekly newspaper distributed door to door and through newsracks did not violate the local littering ordinance as the burden on the town was extraordinarily minor and the burden on private property was trivial. The newspaper, as a noncommercial publication, is entitled to the full protection of the Constitution of the United States and Wyoming. A town may not place a complete ban on speech, a form of prior restraint, if that speech is in a form which may eventually be viewed as litter. Miller v. City of Laramie, 880 P.2d 594,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1994).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Hazardous Waste Cleanup in Wyoming: Legal Tools Available to the Private Citizen,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 395 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).